California, session 20252026, SB559.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8386.7 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:8386.7. (a) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Critical facilities and infrastructure” means publicly or privately owned facilities and services vital to the safety and well-being of the community, including infrastructure that are essential to the public safety and that require additional assistance and advanced planning to ensure resiliency during deenergization events, including, but not limited to, drinking water and wastewater facilities, healthcare medical facilities, communications systems, carrier infrastructure, emergency services, and other critical systems. systems as defined by the protocols adopted by the commission pursuant to paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 8386.(2)“Deenergization” means the action taken by an electrical corporation to turn off electricity to specific areas or circuits in response to conditions that could lead to wildfire risk.(3)“Deenergization event” means a planned electricity outage initiated by an electrical corporation to reduce the risk of wildfire during extreme weather conditions, such as high winds, dry conditions, or other hazardous factors.(4)(2) “Weather data” means real-time weather conditions observed by an electrical corporation at the time of deenergization, including wind speed, wind gust speed, relative humidity, and temperature.(b) (1)At the start of a deenergization event Consistent with the protocols adopted by the commission pursuant to paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 8386, an electrical corporation shall immediately notify local emergency management organizations and local utility districts notify, when possible, and at the time a decision to conduct a deenergization event is made, public safety partners, including emergency response providers and first responders, about the potential public safety impacts of the deenergization. deenergization event. The notification shall include the following information:(A)The specific critical facilities and infrastructure impacted, including healthcare including, but not limited to, health care facilities, water treatment facilities, communications towers, and other public safety critical facilities and infrastructure.(B)An assessment of the potential risks posed to public health, safety, and emergency response capabilities resulting from the loss of electricity at those critical facilities.(2)(c) The electrical corporation shall make every effort to maintain direct lines of communication with public safety agencies partners to ensure the timely sharing of updates regarding deenergization events, including restoration efforts and any damage or other issues affecting all areas. issues.(3)(d) During a deenergization event event, the electrical corporation shall work jointly with local emergency management agencies to establish identify restoration priorities. Priority shall shall, where reasonable, be given to circuits that contain a high number of critical facilities. facilities and infrastructure.(c)(e) Detailed status information on restoration efforts shall be made available to emergency management organizations, public safety officials, customers, and the public in real-time, public, where feasible, with regular progress updates issued at intervals of no more than 12 hours, for all impacted circuits. This information shall include when the circuit is scheduled for inspection, anticipated restoration date and time, and any adverse findings discovered during the inspection process that may delay the restoration process.(d)(f) (1) At the start In advance of a deenergization event, an electrical corporation shall make a reasonable effort to publish and make available real-time weather conditions observed within the affected circuit being considered for deenergization. This weather data shall be included within the notices provided pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c). (e). The data shall may include all of the following information:(A) The sustained wind speed in miles per hour (mph).(B) The maximum wind gust speed in miles per hour (mph).(C) The measured percentage of relative humidity in the affected area.(D) The recorded temperature in degrees Fahrenheit (°F).(2) Throughout the course of a deenergization event an electrical corporation shall make reasonable efforts to publish and make available data, including the real-time weather conditions observed within the affected circuit pursuant to paragraph (1). This information shall be updated on an hourly basis and used to substantiate the ongoing need for continued deenergization.(3) The data published pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be made publicly available on the electrical corporation’s internet website, mobile applications, and other communication channels and shall be accessible in real-time. real time.(e)(g) (1) Once hazardous weather conditions subside, the electrical corporation shall prioritize the restoration of electricity and begin efforts to reenergize lines without unnecessary delays. delays when safe to do so. The electrical corporation shall ensure that restoration is carried out as quickly and safely as possible, taking into consideration the safety of the electrical corporation’s crews and affected communities.(2) The electrical corporation shall be responsible for the continual monitoring and eventual restoration of circuits affected by a deenergization event. Using real-time weather monitoring technology, an electrical corporation shall be responsible for initiating the inspection and restoration process as soon as the observed weather conditions and safety considerations permit.(3)The primary factor used to evaluate eligibility for reenergization for circuits shall be real-time weather and the inspection of the circuit by electrical corporation personnel.(4)(3) Inspection of circuits deenergized due to a deenergization event shall commence within four hours of windspeeds falling below 25 mph and wind gusts not exceeding 40 mph. as soon as it is safe to do so.(f)(h) (1) Each electrical corporation shall annually submit a report to the commission detailing its compliance with the transparency and restoration requirements of this section. The report shall include all of the following:(A) The number of deenergization events activated in the previous year.(B) The timeliness and accuracy of weather data publishing. published and observed during the deenergization event.(C) The extent of communications with customers and public safety agencies.(D) The restoration timelines and any issues encountered during the restoration process.(2) The annual reports provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made publicly available by the commission and the electrical corporation to ensure transparency for stakeholders and the public.(g)(i) The commission shall oversee each electrical corporation’s compliance with this section to ensure that electrical corporations are meeting its transparency, communication, and restoration requirements. The commission shall assess whether an electrical corporation is effectively implementing real-time weather reporting, notifying public safety agencies, and providing timely and accurate restoration information.(h)(j) If an electrical corporation fails to comply with any provision of this section, including failure to publish required weather data, notify public safety agencies, or meet communication standards, the commission may impose financial penalties.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.